Tennessee, session 114, SB0528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-3-112, is amended by deleting the
following language:
the division of parks and recreation shall designate one (1) day per year during which
access to and use of all state parks, including, but not limited to, campgrounds and golf
courses, shall be free of charge for all veterans
and substituting instead the following:
the bureau of parks and conservation shall designate at least one (1) day per year
during which access to and use of all state parks, including, but not limited to,
campgrounds and golf courses, must be free of charge for all veterans
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0528
001720
- 1 -